fr: Matériau du plomb: Plomb; Tungsten; Zinc; Autre
es: Material del plomo: Plomo; Tungsteno; Zinc; Otros
pt-BR: Material da chumbada: Chumbo; Tungstênio; Zinco; Outro
ro-RO: Material plumbi: Plumb; Tungsten; Zinc; Altele
bg-BG: Материал на тежест: Олово; Волфрам; Цинк; Други
cs: Materiál závaží: Olovo; Wolfram; Zinek; Jiné
en: Sinker material: Lead; Tungsten; Zinc; Other
it: Materiale del piombino: Piombo; Tungsteno; Zinco; Altro
ja: シンカー素材: 鉛; タングステン; 亜鉛; その他
sv: Sänke - material: Bly; Volfram; Zink; Övrigt
sk-SK: Materiál potápavých nástrah: Olovený; Volfrám; Zinok; Iné
lt-LT: Svarelio medžiaga: Švinas; Volframas; Cinkas; Kita
ru: Материал грузила: Свинец; Вольфрам; Цинк; Другое
hu: Nehezék anyaga: Ólom; Volfrám; Cink; Egyéb
de: Material des Senkgewichts: Blei; Wolfram; Zink; Sonstiges
da: Synkemateriale: Bly; Wolfram; Zink; Andet
nl: Materiaal visgewicht: Lood; Wolfraam; Zink; Andere
nb: Synkemateriale: Bly; Wolfram; Sink; Annet
tr: Sinker malzemesi: Yol göstermek; Tungsten; Çinko; Diğer
ko: 싱커 소재: 리드; 텅스텐; 아연; 기타
sl-SI: Material ribiške uteži: Svinec; Volfram; Cink; Drugo
fi: Painon materiaali: Lyijy; Volframi; Sinkki; Muu
zh-CN: 铅坠材质: 铅; 钨; 锌; 其他
vi: Vật liệu bồn rửa: Chì; Vonfram; Kẽm; Khác
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำซิงค์เกอร์: ตะกั่ว; ทังสเตน; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał obciążnika: Czoło; Wolfram; Cynk; Inne
el: Υλικό βαριδίου ψαρέματος: Μολυβδύαλος; Βολφράμιο; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material do lava-loiças: Chumbo; Tungsténio; Zinco; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal otežanja: Olovo; Volfram; Cink; Ostalo
zh-TW: 沉降片材質: 鉛; 鎢; 鋅; 其他